District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.20

Penalties; prosecutions; injunction.

(a)

Any person who violates any provision of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01] or by imprisonment for not more than 6 months or both for each violation.

(b)

Prosecutions for violations of any provision of this part shall be conducted in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia. It shall be sufficient to prove in any prosecution or hearing under this part only a single act prohibited by law or a single holding out, or any attempt thereof, without proving a general course of conduct in order to constitute a violation.

(c)

In addition to the remedy set forth in this section, application may be made to a court having competent jurisdiction over the parties and subject matter for a writ of injunction or other civil remedy to restrain violations of the provisions of this part. Such application may be made by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia.

(d)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this part, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this part, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 21, 27 DCR 3528
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 409, 32 DCR 4450
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 75(a), 52 DCR 2638
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 286(w), 60 DCR 2064
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 286(w) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in [§ 22-3571.01]” for “not more than $500” in (a).
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
1981 Ed., § 2-2020.